New York, session 2025-2026, A5609.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (a) of subdivision 8 of section 402 of the vehi- 2 cle and traffic law, as amended by section 3 of subpart A of part WW of 3 chapter 56 of the laws of 2024, is amended to read as follows: 4 (a) A violation of subparagraph (ii), subparagraph (ii-a) or subpara- 5 graph (iii) of paragraph (b) of subdivision one of this section shall be 6 punishable by a fine of not less than one hundred nor more than [five 7 hundred] one thousand dollars. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of November next succeed- 9 ing the date upon which it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09851-01-5